Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5905.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 32-6-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 32-6 entitled "Public Use of
Private Lands — Liability Limitations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
32-6-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Charge” means the admission price or fee asked in return for invitation or permission
to enter or go upon the land;
(2) “Land” means land, roads, water, watercourses, private ways and buildings, structures,
and machinery or equipment when attached to the realty;
(3) “Owner” means the private-owner possessor of a fee interest, or tenant, lessee,
occupant, or person in control of the premises, including the state and municipalities;
(4) “Recreational purposes” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following, or any
combination thereof: hunting, fishing, swimming, boating, camping, picnicking, hiking, horseback
riding, bicycling, pleasure driving, nature study, water skiing, water sports, viewing or enjoying
historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites, and all other recreational purposes
contemplated by this chapter; and
(5) “User” means any person using land for recreational purposes.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002293
========
LC002293 - Page 2 of 3